Hawaii, session 2026, SB876.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the Korean language has an important place in the history of the State.  The Korean community has contributed significantly to local culture for decades by bestowing art, music, cuisine, and traditions upon the fusion of cultures that make the State unique.  South Korea has strong economic ties with the State, and there is a growing interest in learning the Korean language across the nation due in part to the popularity of Korean media such as K-Pop and K‑Dramas. The legislature further finds that the Korean language has an important place in the future of the State.  At the university of Hawaii, Korean is the most popular foreign language program. Korean language proficiency can open career opportunities in business, tourism, and international diplomacy.  Offering Korean language courses in public schools can prepare the next generation for a more globalized world by granting young people opportunities to make valuable transnational connections through study abroad programs and future travel. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Require the department of education to establish a Korean language program to be offered at all public school complexes; and (2)  Appropriate funds for the program, including curriculum development and the establishment of teacher positions. SECTION 2. The department of education shall establish a Korean language program that shall: (1)  Expose students to the Korean language and culture; (2)  Prepare students for future careers and economic development; (3)  Develop a structured curriculum, train teachers, and allocate resources; (4)  Implement innovative and immersive techniques to teach the current tech-savvy generation of students, using K-Pop, stories, viral videos, and dance; and (5)  Research successful models from other schools to ensure effective instruction. SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the establishment and implementation of the Korean language program established pursuant to section 2 of this Act, including the establishment of necessary teacher positions. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of education for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________